New York, session 2025-2026, A8503.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 284 of the agriculture and markets law is amended 2 by adding a new subdivision 10 to read as follows: 3 10. Development and facilitation of the establishment of regional 4 farmers' markets to promote the direct marketing of farm and food 5 products on a wholesale or bulk sales basis to large volume purchasers 6 of farm and food products. Such regional farmers' markets should be, 7 whenever possible, located in areas that have poor consumer access to 8 high quality and reasonably priced food and farm products or food 9 deserts; or which would sell to or cater to the needs of retailers or 10 bulk purchasers of food and farm products that are located in areas that 11 have poor consumer access to high quality and reasonably priced food and 12 farm products or food deserts. The department is authorized to work in 13 cooperation with the New York state urban development corporation and 14 the empire state development corporation for the purposes of this subdi- 15 vision, section sixteen-m of the New York state urban development corpo- 16 ration act and article five-D of the economic development law. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09405-01-5